California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) At the discretion of the commission, any balance remaining in the Aeronautics Account, after the payments made under Section 21682, may be used to provide a portion of the local match for federal Airport Improvement Program grants. Matching shall be provided only for grants at general aviation airports, or at airports that have been designated by the Federal Aviation Administration as reliever airports, as defined in Section 503(a)(19) of the federal Airport and Airway Improvement Act of 1982, as amended.

(b) Funds shall not be allocated by the commission until the federal grant offer is accepted by the public entity. Upon allocation by the commission, the department may pay a public entity an amount equal to 5 percent of the amount of a federal Airport Improvement Program grant. These funds are excluded from the requirements of Section 21684.

(c) Funds shall not be allocated by the commission until the federal grant offer is accepted by the public entity. Upon allocation by the commission, the department may, until December 31, 2006, pay a public entity an amount equal to the 10 percent local match required for a federal Airport Improvement Program grant for security projects at small general aviation airports. For purposes of this section, a “security project” means a project to install or maintain fencing, gates, security lighting, access controls systems, and surveillance systems. For purposes of this section a “small general aviation airport” means an airport with fewer than 80,000 annual landings and take-offs of aircraft.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.   Effective September 21, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21683.2.

Any balance remaining in the Aeronautics Account, after the payments made under Section 21682 and Section 21683.1, shall be used at the discretion of the commission for airport and aviation purposes subject to the provisions of Section 21684.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 671, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21684.

(a) No payment shall be made to a public entity pursuant to this article unless the public entity has established a special aviation fund in which all payments received by a public entity under this article shall be deposited for expenditure solely for airport and aviation purposes. No payment shall be made to a public entity for a project pursuant to Section 21683.2 unless the public entity deposits in its special aviation fund a sum from other than state or federal sources, established annually by the commission at not less than 10 percent nor more than 50 percent of the nonfederal portion of the project.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision requiring matching funds, the department shall pay to each public entity owning and operating an airport or airports the annual amount that is in accordance with Section 21682.

(b) No payment shall be made for any airport to the University of California pursuant to this article unless the university has established a special aviation fund in which all payments received by the university under this article shall be deposited for expenditure solely for airport and aviation purposes. No payment shall be made for any airport to the University of California pursuant to Section 21683.2 unless the university deposits in its special aviation fund each year, for expenditure solely for airport and aviation purposes, a sum from nonstate or nonfederal funds based on the rate established annually by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a), or unless a city located within 10 miles of the airport or the county within which the airport is located pays to the university a sum based on the rate established annually by the commission pursuant to subdivision (a). However, any sums so deposited by the university or paid by the city or county may be considered jointly as meeting the requirements of this section. The payments received from a city or county pursuant to these sections are to be expended solely for the airport and for aviation purposes related to such airport. All payments received by the university shall be deposited in its special aviation fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 671, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

21684.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 21683, any balance remaining in the fund after the payments made under Section 21682 may be used by the department to purchase emergency search and rescue equipment and to make such equipment available for use by recognized search and rescue groups. The equipment shall remain the property of the department. No more than eight thousand dollars ($8,000) shall be expended pursuant to this section for the purchase of emergency search and rescue equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1606.)
-------------------------------------------

21684.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article inasmuch as they require matching funds the department may allocate funds to public agencies for the construction of airports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1566.)
-------------------------------------------

21684.6.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, inasmuch as they require matching funds, the department may allocate funds to a county or a city for the construction of recreational airports or reliever training airstrips in accordance with regulations of the department if the county or city supplies the land and maintains and operates all facilities of such airport or airstrip.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 768.)
-------------------------------------------

21685.

Any public entity may pay any part of the money in its special aviation fund to a state college or branch of the University of California located within its boundaries to be expended for the same purposes as the public entity may expend such money. Any money paid to a state college or branch of the University of California shall be expended within the public entity paying the money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1566.)
-------------------------------------------

21686.

It shall be the duty of any public entity receiving payments or allocations under this article to periodically audit its books and records as deemed necessary by the department for the purpose of determining that the money received has been expended for the purposes and under the conditions authorized by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 101, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21687.

(a) (1) If an airport, for which payments have been made from the Aeronautics Account, ceases to be open to the general public for more than one year, the public entity to which those payments were made shall pay to the state funds equal to the amount computed by the department pursuant to paragraph (2), and those funds shall be deposited in the Aeronautics Account.

(2) (A) The department shall compute an amount equal to the total of all payments made for the airport from the Aeronautics Account during the preceding 20 years, less 5 percent of the amount of a particular payment multiplied by the number of years since the payment was made, or the unused balance, whichever is greater. 

(B) The computation described in subparagraph (A) shall not include any payment the department made pursuant to Section 21682, if, upon the request of the public entity that owns and operates the airport, the department determines that the airport is not necessary to the system of public airports in this state. When making this determination, the department shall consider all of the following factors:

(i) Whether the airport is approved for night operations.

(ii) Whether the airport has an approved instrument approach procedure.

(iii) How many aircraft are based at the airport.

(iv) Whether the airport is used for airborne fire attacks.

(v) Whether the airport is used for emergency medical transportation.

(vi) What services the airport provides for the community.

(vii) The size of the community that is served by the airport.

(viii) Whether any aviation or transportation planning agency has designated the airport as having a significant role.

(ix) Whether a suitable, public-use airport is situated within a reasonable distance.

(x) Whether closure of the airport will have a negative effect on other airports.

(xi) Whether the airport is used for law enforcement purposes.

(b) This section does not apply to either of the following:

(1) An airport that is replaced by a comparable facility, as determined by the department, within a period of one year.

(2) An airport for which the department, on or after January 1, 1981, has suspended the airport permit and for which payments made pursuant to this article are being expended to correct the deficiency or condition that resulted in the suspension of the airport’s permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 105, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

21688.

(a) No payments shall be made from the Aeronautics Account for expenditure on any airport or for the acquisition or development of any airport, if the department determines that the height restrictions around the airport are inadequate to provide reasonable assurance that the landing and taking off of aircraft at the airport will be conducted without obstruction or will be otherwise free from hazards.

Height restrictions shall be considered adequate if as a minimum they meet the obstruction standards of subchapter C of Part 77 of the Federal Aviation Regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration, as these standards apply to civil airport imaginary surfaces related to runways.

The airport-owning entity shall have sufficient control over obstructions in the airspace in the vicinity of the airport to assure that height restrictions can be maintained. This control may be in the form of ownership of any land from which obstructions may rise, air navigation easements to guarantee maintenance of restrictions, or height limitation or land use zoning which will prohibit obstructions which would violate the obstruction standards.

(b) This section shall not prevent or prohibit the department from assisting any public agency or public entity in planning airport development or in planning the zoning needs around an airport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Airport Facilities and Concessions [21690.5. - 21690.10.]

21690.5.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) The proper operation of California’s publicly owned or operated airports is essential to the welfare of the state and its people.

(b) California’s publicly owned or operated airports establish a vital transportation link between the state and the economic systems of the nation and the world, and enable the state to enjoy and provide the benefits of an international tourist and commercial center.

(c) The economic validity and stability of California’s publicly owned or operated airports is, consequently, a matter of statewide importance.

(d) The policy of this state is to promote the development of commerce and tourism to the end of securing to the people of this state the benefits of these activities conducted in the state.

(e) Therefore, since the proper operation of the state’s publicly owned or operated airports is essential to the welfare of the state and its people, the Legislature recognizes and affirms such operation as a governmental function to be discharged in furtherance of the policy of securing the benefits of commerce and tourism for the state and its people.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.6.

The provisions of this article shall apply to any airport owned or operated by a political subdivision, including a charter city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.7.

The governing bodies of publicly owned or operated airports shall manage airport facilities and grant airport concessions in furtherance of the development of commerce and tourism in or affecting the state. In managing facilities and granting concessions for services to the public, such airport governing bodies shall promote the development of commerce and tourism by (a) securing a diversity of airport services; (b) avoiding wasteful duplication of such services; (c) securing to the users of airports safe, courteous, and quality service; (d) limiting or prohibiting business competition which is destructive of the ends of promoting commerce and tourism in the state; (e) allocating limited airport resources to promote such ends; and (f) fostering California’s image as a commercial and tourist center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.8.

The Legislature recognizes that to further the policies and fulfill the objectives stated in this article, it is often necessary that publicly owned or operated airports enter into exclusive or limited agreements with a single operator or a limited number of operators. The governing bodies of publicly owned or operated airports shall grant exclusive or limited agreements to displace business competition with regulation or monopoly service whenever the governing body determines, in consideration of the factors set forth in Section 21690.9, that such agreements are necessary to further the policies and to fulfill the objectives stated in this article. The Legislature contemplates that publicly owned or operated airports will grant exclusive or limited agreements in furtherance of the policy of this state to displace business competition by exclusive or limited agreements to fulfill these policies and objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.9.

Before entering any exclusive or limited agreement in connection with the management of any airport facility or the operation of any airport concession, the governing body of a publicly owned or operated airport shall, under authority hereby expressly delegated by the state, determine the necessity for an exclusive or limited agreement. The governing body shall consider the following factors to determine the necessity for an exclusive or limited agreement to further the policies and objectives stated in this article:

(a) Public safety.

(b) Public convenience.

(c) Quality of service.

(d) The need to conserve airport space.

(e) The need to avoid duplication of services.

(f) The impact on the environment or facilities of the airport as an essential commercial and tourist service center.

(g) The need to avoid destructive competition which may impair the quality of airport services to the public, lead to uncertainty, disruption, or instability in the rendering of such services, or detract from the state’s attractiveness as a center of tourism and commerce.

In making its determination, the airport operator shall not be required to take evidence or to make findings of fact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.10.

Nothing in this article shall excuse any local agency from complying with applicable state or local requirements for competitive bidding or public hearings which may be required prior to the awarding or entering into of any bid, agreement or lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 767, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Los Angeles International Airport Relocation and Development [21690.20. - 21690.29.]

21690.20.

The Legislature hereby finds that Los Angeles International Airport is one of the important air terminals of the world, making a significant contribution daily to the economy of California.

Since 1959, jet air traffic at the airport has increased from 80 flights daily to nearly 1,000 daily. This increasing air traffic and necessary expansion of airport facilities has had an adverse affect on the residents of the surrounding areas. Expansion and development has and is expected to require the acquisition of many homes in the vicinity of the airport and has rendered other homes in areas subjected to aircraft noise nearly uninhabitable. Property owners in the vicinity of the airport are either unable to sell their homes or able to sell only at depressed market prices. Under present laws, the Department of Airports of the City of Los Angeles is required only to pay homeowners “fair market value” for their property. With increasing property costs and current high interest rates, it is impossible for a homeowner to purchase a comparable dwelling in a comparable residential area for amounts now being paid as “fair market value.”

The City Council of the City of Los Angeles has initiated this legislation to enable the city to (1) assist displaced homeowners to relocate in comparable residential areas and housing, (2) provide, where available, replacement housing acceptable to affected homeowners, and (3) purchase affected homes to compensate homeowners for the depressed values of their property.

There is precedent for the provision of replacement housing, where available, in Chapter 953 of the Statutes of 1968, by which the Department of Public Works is authorized to provide relocation assistance and replacement housing to certain individuals and families displaced because of construction of certain state highway projects. Further, there is precedent for relocation payments to compensate certain homeowners in Public Law 90-495 and in Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 1968, First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.21.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this article:

(a) “Airport” means Los Angeles International Airport.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Airports, City of Los Angeles.

(c) “Mayor” means the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles.

(d) “Board” means the Los Angeles International Airport Property Acquisition Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.22.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department is authorized to:

(a) Assist homeowners displaced by the expansion of the airport to relocate in comparable residential areas and housing.

(b) Provide, where available, replacement housing acceptable to affected homeowners.

(c) Purchase affected property to compensate homeowners for the depressed values of their property as a result of the proximity of the airport to enable such homeowners to purchase comparable housing under more normal market conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.23.

The department is authorized to expend any available funds, including state and federal funds, for the purpose of purchasing homes from homeowners displaced by the expansion of the airport and relocating or providing suitable replacement housing for such persons, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.24.

Upon establishment of a program for additional payments to homeowners by the department pursuant to this article, the affected property owners may petition as provided in Section 21690.26 for the payment of additional compensation for the depressed value of the affected property resulting from the presence and operation of the airport, provided that such owner has not previously recovered any sums in the nature of an inverse condemnation award by reason of the presence and operation of the airport.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.25.

Upon establishment by the department of a program for such additional compensation, the mayor shall appoint, subject to the approval of the city council, five persons who shall constitute the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.26.

The members of the board shall serve at the pleasure of the mayor, and any action taken by a majority thereof shall constitute the action of the board. The board shall hear petitions from homeowners dislocated by reason of airport expansion and operations for amounts to be paid in excess of market value of affected property. The board shall establish procedures for the conduct of its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.27.

The Board of Airport Commissioners of the City of Los Angeles is directed to pay any sum awarded by the board pursuant to Section 21690.26.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.28.

The provisions of this article are available only to persons who own residential property which has been or is being condemned or sold for airport purposes. Petitions for additional compensation may be filed with the board at the same time that condemnation proceedings or acquisition negotiations are initiated; and the board shall pay any sum awarded pursuant to Section 21690.26 within 60 days after condemnation or other acquisition proceedings are completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

21690.29.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Proceedings [21692. - 21694.]

21692.

The department, any member, the director, or any officer or employee of the department designated by it may hold investigations, inquiries, and hearings concerning matters covered by this part and the rules and orders of the department, and concerning accidents in aeronautics within this state. Hearings shall be open to the public and, except as provided in Section 21691, shall be held upon such call or notice as the department deems advisable. Each member of the department, the director, and every officer or employee of the department designated by it to hold any inquiry, investigation, or hearing may administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official acts, issue subpoenas, and order the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of papers, books, and documents. If any person fails to comply with any subpoenas or order issued under the authority of this section, the department or its authorized representative may invoke the aid of any court of general jurisdiction. The court may order such person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena or order to give evidence touching the matter in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21693.

In order to facilitate the making of investigations by the department in the interest of public safety and promotion of aeronautics, the reports of investigations or hearings or any part of the reports, shall not be admitted in evidence or used for any purpose in any suit, action, or proceeding growing out of any matter referred to in the investigation, hearing, or report, except in case of any suit, action, or proceeding, civil or criminal, instituted by or in behalf of the department or in the name of the state under the provisions of this part or other laws of the state relating to aeronautics. Any member of the department, the director, or any officer or employee of the department shall not be required to testify to any facts ascertained in, or information gained by reason of, his official capacity, nor be required to testify as an expert witness in any suit, action, or proceeding involving any aircraft. Subject to these limitations, the department may make available to appropriate federal, state, and political subdivision agencies information and material developed in the course of its investigations and hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

21694.

Every order of the department requiring performance of certain acts or compliance with certain requirements shall set forth the reasons, state the acts to be done or requirements to be met, and be served upon the person affected either by registered mail or in person. Any person aggrieved by an order of the department may have the action of the department reviewed by the courts in the manner provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Airport Planning [21701. - 21707.]

21701.

The division, in consultation with transportation planning agencies as designated by the director pursuant to Section 29532 of the Government Code, shall prepare a California Aviation System Plan, which shall include, but not be limited to, every California airport designated in the federal National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems and any other existing or proposed public use airports, as designated by the division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1149, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21702.

The California Aviation System Plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(a) A background and introduction element, which summarizes aviation activity in California and establishes goals and objectives for aviation improvement.

(b) An air transportation issues element, which addresses issues such as aviation safety, airport noise, airport ground access, transportation systems management, airport financing, airport land use compatibility planning, and institutional relationships.

(c) A regional plan alternative element, which consists of the aviation elements of the regional transportation plans prepared by each transportation planning agency. This element shall include consideration of regional air transportation matters relating to growth, capacity needs, county activity, airport activity, and systemwide activity in order to evaluate adequately the overall impacts of regional activity in relation to the statewide air transportation system. This element shall propose general aviation and air carrier public use airports for consideration by the commission for funding eligibility under this chapter.

(d) A state plan alternative element, which includes consideration of statewide air transportation matters relating to growth, including, but not limited to, county activity, airport activity, and systemwide activity in order to evaluate adequately the state aviation system and to designate an adequate number of general aviation and air carrier public use airports for state funding in order to provide a level of air service and safety acceptable to the public.

(e) A comparative element, which compares and contrasts the regional plan alternative with the state plan alternative, including, but not limited to, airport noise, air quality, toxic waste cleanup, energy, economics, and passengers served.

(f) A 10-year capital improvement plan for each airport, based on each airport’s adopted master plan if the airport has a master plan, approved by the applicable transportation planning agency, and submitted to the division for inclusion in the California Aviation System Plan.

(g) Any other element deemed appropriate by the division and the transportation planning agencies.

(h) A summary and conclusion element, which presents the findings and recommended course of action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21703.

The division shall submit the California Aviation System Plan to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1149, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21704.

The division, in consultation with the transportation planning agencies, shall biennially revise the capital improvement plan developed pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 21702, and the division shall submit the revised capital improvement plan to the commission. The division, in consultation with the transportation planning agencies, shall revise all other elements of the California Aviation System Plan every five years, and shall submit the revised system plan to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21705.

The commission shall review, hold public hearings on, and, based on these hearings, adopt or revise and adopt as revised, the California Aviation System Plan and its subsequent revisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1149, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21706.

The division shall require that every project submitted for funding from the Aeronautics Account in the State Transportation Fund shall be consistent with the California Aviation System Plan. Applications for funding shall be processed in accordance with the procedures adopted by the commission. In determining the priorities of projects, the division shall, and the transportation planning agencies may, utilize the methodology adopted by the commission for determining the priorities of projects that the commission selects for allocation pursuant to Sections 21683 and 21683.2 and the procedures adopted by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 270, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

21707.

Any funds necessary to carry out Sections 21701, 21702, and 21704 shall be obtained from federal grants, except for updates of the capital improvement plan and policy elements of the California Aviation System Plan, which may be funded from nonfederal sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 525, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Skydiving or Sport Parachuting Operations [21708. - 21709.]

21708.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “Tyler’s Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 258, Sec. 2.   (AB 295)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21709.

(a) To the extent allowed by federal law, the owners and operators of a skydiving or sport parachuting operation shall have a duty to ensure that the parachutist in command of a tandem jump and the parachute rigger responsible for packing the parachute are in compliance with all federal laws relating to parachute safety and certification.

(b) This section does not decrease any legal duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 258, Sec. 2.   (AB 295)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Leaded Aviation Gasoline [21710. - 21712.]

21710.

For purposes of this chapter, “aviation retail establishment” means any public or private entity that sells aviation gasoline, or offers or otherwise makes available aviation gasoline, to a customer, including other businesses or government entities, for use in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21711.

An airport operator or aviation retail establishment shall not sell, distribute, or otherwise make available leaded aviation gasoline to consumers on or after January 1, 2031, in compliance with Section 47107 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21712.

If a provision of this chapter conflicts with a federal grant assurance in effect on or before December 31, 2030, that provision shall not apply to an airport operator subject to that grant assurance until the federal grant assurance expires.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. AIRPORT DISTRICTS [22001. - 22909.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [22001. - 22017.]

22001.

This part may be cited as the “California Airport District Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

The purpose of this part is to facilitate the formation of intercity and county airport districts having responsibility for the development of airports, spaceports, and air navigation facilities, the objective being to encourage airport and spaceport development by communities and to distribute the cost uniformly among all who benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 191, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 401, Sec. 52.   (AB 2763)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22004.

Airport districts may be created, maintained, and managed as provided in this part and may exercise the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.

A district may lie within or include the territories of one or more counties. It may include one or more cities, all or any part of any city and any part of the unincorporated territory of any county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22006.

The boundaries of a district may be altered and outlying contiguous territory in the same or an adjoining county annexed to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

22007.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the law governing the qualifications of electors, the manner of voting, the duties of election officers, the canvassing of returns, declaration of results, and all other particulars in respect to the calling and holding of general municipal elections in cities of the fifth and sixth class, so far as applicable, governs all district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22008.

“District” means airport district, formed and proposed to be formed, pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22009.

“Principal county” means the county in which all of the territory of the district is situated, or if the territory is situated in more than one county, the county in which the greatest portion of the territory is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22010.

“Affected county” means any county in which the territory of the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22011.

“Board” means the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22012.

“Director” means member of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22013.

“Secretary” means secretary of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22014.

“Bond election” means an election provided for in Article 2 (commencing with Section 22731) of Chapter 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

22015.

“Formation election” means an election provided for in Article 4 (commencing with Section 22226) of Chapter 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 175.)
-------------------------------------------

22016.

“Bond tax” means the tax levied pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 22901) for the payment of the bonded indebtedness of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

22017.

“District tax” means the tax levied pursuant to Chapter 6 for the payment of expenses of, and claims against the district, other than the bonded indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation [22151. - 22259.]



  ARTICLE 1. Resolution [22151. - 22153.]

22151.

The board of supervisors of each county desiring to form, or join in forming, a district shall adopt a resolution of intention to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22152.

Each resolution shall contain:

(a) A statement of intention to form a district.

(b) The boundaries of the district or some other designation of its territorial extent.

(c) The name of the district.

(d) The time and place for hearing objections to the formation of the district or to its extent. The time of the hearing shall not be less than 30 days after the adoption of the resolution.

(e) The name of the newspaper in which the resolution shall be published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22153.

Each resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the county concerned. The board of supervisors may order it published in more than one newspaper. Publication shall be at least 20 days before the date of hearing. The publication of the resolution constitutes the notice of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Investigation and Termination by Majority Protest [22176. - 22178.]

22176.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the District Investigation Law of 1933 applies to districts formed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22177.

Section 22178 of this code supersedes Section 58680 of the Government Code, with respect to districts formed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

22178.

The requirements of the District Investigation Law for the mailing of the notice of hearing, and for the inclusion in the report of value and liability statements provided for in Article 3 of that law, do not apply to districts formed under this part if the board of supervisors of each affected county, prior to the hearing on the formation of the district, finds by resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of its members that:

(a) In its opinion the probable assessments will not exceed the limitations prescribed in the District Investigation Law.

(b) The property to be assessed will be able to carry the assessments.

(c) The assessment limitations may be dispensed with.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing [22201. - 22204.]

22201.
